South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S389.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the State Commission on Higher Education, relating to LIFE Scholarship and Scholarship Enhancement, designated as Regulation Document Number 5321, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Commission on Higher Education proposes the following revisions to Chapter 62 regulation, R.62-1200.1 through 62-1200.75, LIFE Scholarship Program. Revisions to the existing regulation for the LIFE Scholarship & LIFE Scholarship Enhancement Program are being considered to clarify the policies and procedures for administrating the program. In the proposed amendments, regulation is being updated to reflect the passage of Act 156 of 2024, allowing for the awarding of LIFE Scholarship Enhancements to students in approved STEM and Education Degree programs. Lastly, other changes to the regulation include updating of definitions and minor language changes to promote consistency. The proposed regulation will require legislative review. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on May 24, 2024. ----XX----